District of Columbia statutes.
4-1423

Agreements with other states.

An officer of the District that has the authority to place children and an official of a private agency licensed as a child placement agency by the District government pursuant to subchapter I of this chapter, is authorized to enter into an agreement with the appropriate officer or agency in another party state pursuant to subsection (b) of Article V of the compact.

History

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-30, § 4, 36 DCR 4744

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1043.